Illinois, session 104th, HB4959.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-109.2 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/15-109.2 new)7    Sec. 15-109.2. Covers or tarpaulins required for 8construction loads.9    (a) No person shall operate or cause to be operated on a 10highway in the course of the person's employment a vehicle 11owned by the person's employer, which may include the person 12operating the vehicle if the person is self-employed, with a 13cargo area loaded with construction material, when any portion 14of the load is falling, sifting, blowing, dropping or in any 15way escaping from the vehicle. No person shall operate or 16cause to be operated on a highway in the course of the person's 17employment a vehicle owned by the person's employer, which may 18include the person operating the vehicle if the person is 19self-employed, with a tailgate transporting construction 20material unless the tailgate on the vehicle is in good working 21repair, good operating condition, and closes securely, with a 22cover or tarpaulin of sufficient size attached, so as to 23prevent any load, residue, or other material from escaping.  HB4959- 2 -LRB104 18439 LNS 31881 b1    (b) If another person's vehicle is damaged due to a 2violation of subsection (a), the owner of the vehicle, which 3may include the person operating the vehicle if the person is 4self-employed, involved in the violation shall be responsible 5for compensating the other person in an amount equal to the 6amount needed to repair the other person's vehicle.